Utah statutes.
17-16-1.   Eligibility and residency requirements for county, district, precinct, or prosecution district office.

(1)  A person filing a declaration of candidacy for a county, district, precinct, or prosecution district office shall:

(a)  be a United States citizen;

(b)  except as provided in Section 20A-1-509.2 with respect to the office of county attorney or district attorney, as of the date of the election, have been a resident for at least one year of the county, district, precinct, or prosecution district in which the person seeks office; and

(c)  be a registered voter in the county, district, precinct, or prosecution district in which the person seeks office.

(2) (a)  A county, district, precinct, or prosecution district officer shall maintain residency within the county, district, precinct, or prosecution district in which the officer was elected during the officer's term of office.

(b)  If a county, district, precinct, or prosecution district officer establishes the officer's principal place of residence as provided in Section 20A-2-105 outside the county, district, precinct, or prosecution district in which the officer was elected, the office is automatically vacant.



Amended by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

